Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Powers of Attorney.
Sec. 13.26.665.
Interpretation of provisions in statutory form power of attorney.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to real estate transactions shall be construed to mean that, as to an estate or interest in land of the principal, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

accept as a gift or as security for a loan, demand, buy, lease, receive, or otherwise acquire either ownership or possession of any estate or interest in land;

sell, exchange, convey, quitclaim, release, surrender, mortgage, encumber, partition or consent to the partitioning, grant options concerning, lease or sublet, or otherwise to dispose of, an estate or interest in land;

release in whole or in part, assign the whole or a part of, satisfy in whole or in part, and enforce a mortgage, encumbrance, lien, or other claim to land that exists, or is claimed to exist, in favor of the principal;

do any act of management or of conservation with respect to an estate or interest in land owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal, including by way of illustration, but not of restriction, power to insure against any casualty, liability, or loss, obtain or regain possession or protect the estate or interest, pay, compromise, or contest taxes or assessments, or apply for refunds in connection with a payment, compromise, or tax, purchase supplies, hire assistance of labor, and make repairs or alterations in the structures or land;

use, develop, modify, alter, replace, remove, erect, or install structures or other improvements on land in which the principal has, or claims to have, an estate or interest;

demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be entitled as the proceeds of an interest in land or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this subsection;

participate in any reorganization with respect to real property and receive and hold any shares of stock or instrument of similar character received under a plan of reorganization, and act with respect to a plan of reorganization, including by way of illustration, but not of restriction, power to sell or otherwise to dispose of shares, to exercise or to sell an option, conversion, or similar right, and to vote in person by the granting of a proxy;

agree and contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms that the agent may select, for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this subsection, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify an agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver a deed, mortgage, lease, notice, check, or other instrument that the agent considers useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this subsection;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a real estate transaction or intervene in any related action;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers that action to be desirable for the proper execution of a power described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent with respect to any estate or interest in land.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to tangible personal property, chattels, and goods transactions shall be construed to mean that, as to tangible personal property, chattels, or goods owned by the principal, whether located in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

accept as a gift, or as a security for a loan, reject, demand, buy, receive, or otherwise acquire either ownership or possession of chattels or goods or an interest in the tangible personal property, chattels, or goods;

sell, exchange, convey, release, surrender, mortgage, encumber, pledge, hypothecate, pawn, grant options concerning, lease or sublet to others, or otherwise dispose of tangible personal property, chattels, or goods or an interest in them;

release in whole or in part, assign the whole or a part of, satisfy in whole or in part, and enforce a mortgage, encumbrance, lien, or other claim that exists, or is claimed to exist, in favor of the principal with respect to any tangible personal property, chattels, or goods or an interest in them;

do any act of management or of conservation with respect to any tangible personal property, chattels, or goods or to an interest in any tangible personal property, chattels, or goods owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal, including by way of illustration, but not of restriction, power to insure against any casualty, liability, or loss, obtain or regain possession, or protect the tangible personal property, chattels, or goods or an interest in them, pay, compromise, or contest taxes or assessments, apply for refunds in connection with a payment, compromise, or tax, move from place to place, store for hire or on a gratuitous bailment, use, alter, and make repairs or alterations of any tangible personal property, chattels, or goods, or an interest in them;

demand, receive, and obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of any tangible personal property, chattels, or goods or of an interest in them, or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this subsection, conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received for purposes enumerated in this subsection, and reimburse the agent for any expenditures properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the power of attorney;

agree and contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms that the agent may select, for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify any agreement or contract or any other similar agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver a conveyance, mortgage, lease, notice, check or other instrument that the agent considers useful for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a transaction involving tangible personal property, chattels, or goods, or intervene in an action or proceeding;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers the action to be desirable to the proper execution of a power described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action;

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent with respect to any chattels or goods or interest in any tangible personal property, chattels, or goods.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to bonds, shares, and commodities transactions shall be construed to mean that, with respect to a bond, share, or commodity of the principal, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

accept as a gift, or as a security for a loan, reject, demand, buy, receive, or otherwise acquire either ownership or possession of, a bond, share, or instrument of similar character including, by way of illustration, but not of restriction, stock in a corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), commodity interest, or an instrument with respect to a bond, share, or instruments of similar character, together with the interest, dividends, proceeds, or other distributions connected with a bond, share, or instrument of a similar character;

sell, exchange, transfer, release, surrender, hypothecate, pledge, grant options concerning, loan, trade in, or otherwise dispose of a bond, share, instrument of similar character, commodity interest, or a related instrument;

release, assign the whole or part of, satisfy in whole or in part, and enforce a pledge, encumbrance, lien, or other claim as to a bond, share, instrument of similar character, commodity interest, or a related interest, when the pledge, encumbrance, lien, or other claim is owned, or claimed to be owned, by the principal;

do any act of management or of conservation with respect to a bond, share, instrument of similar character, commodity interest, or a related instrument, owned or claimed to be owned by the principal or in which the principal has or claims to have an interest, including by way of illustration, but not of restriction, power to insure against a casualty, liability, or loss, obtain or regain possession or protect the principal’s interest, pay, compromise, or contest taxes or assessments, apply for a refund in connection with a payment, compromise, or tax, consent to and participate in a reorganization, recapitalization, liquidation, merger, consolidation, sale or lease or other change in or revival of a corporation or other association, or in the financial structure of a corporation or other association, or in the priorities, voting rights, or other special rights with respect to a corporation or association, become a depositor with a protective, reorganization or similar committee of the bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest or a related instrument, belonging to the principal, make a payment reasonably incident to them, and exercise or sell an option, conversion, or similar right, or vote in person or by the granting of a proxy for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection;

carry in the name of a nominee selected by the agent evidence of the ownership of a bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest, or related instrument belonging to the principal;

employ, in any way believed to be desirable by the agent, a bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest, or a related instrument, in which the principal has or claims to have an interest, for the protection or continued operation of a speculative or margin transaction personally begun or personally guaranteed, in whole or in part, by the principal;

demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is, or may claim to be, entitled as the proceeds of an interest in a bond, share, other instrument of similar character, commodity interest or a related instrument, or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this subsection, conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received for purposes enumerated in this subsection; and reimburse the agent for an expenditure properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form power of attorney;

agree and contract, in any manner, and with a broker or other person, and on terms that the agent may select, for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify the agreement or contract or other similar agreement made by or on behalf of the principal;

execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver a consent, agreement, authorization, assignment, notice, waiver of notice, check, or other instrument that the agent considers useful for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection;

execute, acknowledge and file a report or certificate required by law or regulation;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a bond, share, or commodity transactions, or intervene in a related action or proceeding;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers that action to be desirable for the proper execution of the powers described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent, with respect to an interest in a bond, share, or other instrument of similar character, commodity, or instrument with respect to a commodity.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to banking transactions shall be construed to mean that, as to a banking transaction engaged in by the principal, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

continue, modify, or terminate a deposit account or other banking arrangement made by or on the behalf of the principal before the execution of the power of attorney;

open, either in the name of the agent alone or in the name of the principal alone, or in both their names jointly, a deposit account of any type in a financial institution selected by the agent, hire a safe deposit box or vault space, and enter into contracts for the procuring of other services made available by the institution that the agent considers desirable;

make, sign, and deliver checks or drafts for any purpose, and withdraw funds or property of the principal deposited with or left in the custody of a financial institution, wherever located, either before or after the execution of the power of attorney;

prepare financial statements concerning the assets and liabilities or income and expenses of the principal, and deliver the statements to a financial institution or person whom the agent believes to be reasonably entitled to them;

receive statements, vouchers, notices, or other documents from a financial institution and act with respect to them;

have free access to a safe deposit box or vault to which the principal would have access if personally present;

borrow money as the agent may determine, give security out of the assets of the principal as the agent considers necessary for the borrowing, and pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a financial institution by any other procedure made available by the institution;

make, assign, endorse, discount, guarantee, use, and negotiate promissory notes, bills of exchange, checks, drafts, credit and debit cards, electronic transaction authorizations, or other negotiable or nonnegotiable paper of the principal, or payable to the principal or to the principal’s order, receive the cash or other proceeds of them; and accept any bill of exchange or draft drawn by any person upon the principal, and pay it when due;

receive for the principal and deal in and with a negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument in which the principal has or claims to have an interest;

apply for and receive letters of credit or traveler’s checks from a banker or banking institution selected by the agent, giving indemnity or other agreements in connection with the applications or receipts that the agent considers desirable or necessary;

consent to an extension in the time of payment with respect to commercial paper or a banking transaction in which the principal has an interest or by which the principal is, or might be, affected in any way;

pay, compromise, or contest taxes or assessments and apply for refunds in connection with the payment, compromise, or contest;

demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be entitled as the proceeds of any banking transaction conducted by the principal or by the agent in the execution of the powers described in this subsection, or partly by the principal and partly by the agent; conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for purposes enumerated in this subsection, and reimburse the agent for an expenditure properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form power of attorney;

execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver an instrument, in the name of the principal or otherwise, that the agent considers useful for the accomplishment of a purpose enumerated in this subsection;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a banking transaction, or intervene in an action or proceeding relating to a banking transaction;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers that the action is desirable for the proper execution of the powers described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent in connection with a banking transaction that does or might in any way affect the financial or other interests of the principal.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to business operating transactions shall be construed to mean that, with respect to a business in which the principal has an interest, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent

to the extent that an agent is permitted by law to act for a principal, to discharge and perform any duty or liability and exercise any right, power, privilege, or option that the principal has, or claims to have, under a contract of partnership, whether as a general or special partner, enforce the terms of the partnership agreement for the protection of the principal that the agent considers desirable or necessary, and defend, submit to arbitration, settle, or compromise an action to which the principal is a party because of membership in a partnership;

to exercise in person or by proxy or enforce a right, power, privilege, or option that the principal has as the holder of a bond, share, or other instrument of similar character, and defend, submit to arbitration, settle, or compromise an action to which the principal is a party because of a bond, share, or other instrument of similar character;

with respect to a business enterprise that is owned solely by the principal, to

continue, modify, renegotiate, extend and terminate a contractual arrangement made with a person, firm, association, or corporation by or on behalf of the principal;

determine the policy of the enterprise as to the location of the site or sites to be used for its operation, the nature and extent of the business to be undertaken by it, the methods of manufacturing, selling, merchandising, financing, accounting, and advertising to be employed in its operation, the amount and types of insurance to be carried, the mode of securing compensation and dealing with accountants, attorneys, and employees required for its operation, agree and contract, in any manner, and with any person and on any terms, that the agent considers desirable or necessary to carry out any or all of the decisions of the agent as to policy, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify an agreement or contract or any other similar agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

change the name or form of organization under which the business is operated and enter into a partnership agreement with others or organize a corporation to take over the operation of the business, or any part of it, that the agent considers desirable or necessary;

demand and receive all money that is or may become due to the principal, or that may be claimed by the principal or on the principal’s behalf, in the operation of the enterprise, and control and disburse the funds in the operation of the enterprise in any way that the agent considers desirable or necessary, and engage in banking transactions that the agent considers desirable or necessary to carry out the execution of the powers of the agent described in this subparagraph;

to prepare, sign, file, and deliver all reports, compilations of information, returns, and other papers with respect to a business operating transaction of the principal that is required by a government agency or that the agent considers desirable or necessary for any purpose, and make any payments with respect to the agency;

to pay, compromise, or contest taxes or assessments and do any act or acts that the agent considers desirable or necessary to protect the principal from illegal or unnecessary taxation, fines, penalties, or assessments in connection with the business operations;

to demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is or may claim to be entitled as the proceeds of a business operation of the principal, conserve, invest, disburse, and use anything so received for purposes enumerated in this subsection, and reimburse the agent for expenditures properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form power of attorney;

to execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver a deed, assignment, mortgage, lease, notice, consent, agreement, authorization check, or other instrument that the agent considers useful for the accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this subsection;

to prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a business operating transaction or intervene in a related action;

to hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent reasonably believes that the action is desirable for the proper execution of the powers described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action;

to operate, buy, sell, enlarge, reduce, or terminate an ownership interest;

to put additional capital into an entity or business in which the principal has an interest;

to join in a plan of reorganization, consolidation, conversion, domestication, or merger of the entity or business;

to sell or liquidate all or part of an entity or business;

to establish the value of an entity or business under a buy-out agreement to which the principal is a party; and

to do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent in connection with a business operated by the principal that the agent considers desirable or necessary for the furtherance or protection of the interests of the principal.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to insurance transactions shall be construed to mean that, as to a contract of insurance in which the principal has an interest, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

continue, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, or terminate any contract of life, accident, health, disability, or liability insurance, or any combination of insurance, procured by or on behalf of the principal before the creation of the agency that insures either the principal or any other person without regard to whether the principal is or is not a beneficiary under the insurance coverage;

procure new, different, or additional contracts on the life of the principal or protecting the principal with respect to ill health, disability, accident, or liability of any sort, select the amount, the type of insurance contract, and the mode of payment under each policy, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, or terminate a contract so procured by the agent; and designate the beneficiary of the contract of insurance, except that the agent cannot be the beneficiary unless the agent is spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of the principal;

apply for and receive a loan on the security of the contract of insurance, whether for the payment of a premium or for the procuring of cash; surrender and receive the cash surrender value; exercise an election as to beneficiary or mode of payment, change the manner of paying premiums, change or convert the type of insurance contract with respect to any insurance that the principal has, or claims to have, as to any power described in this subsection; and change the beneficiary of a contract of insurance, except that the agent cannot be the new beneficiary unless the agent is spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of the principal;

demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be entitled as the proceeds of a contract of insurance or of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this subsection; conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for purposes enumerated in this subsection and reimburse the agent for expenditures properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form power of attorney;

apply for and procure available government aid in the guaranteeing or paying of premiums of a contract of insurance on the life of the principal;

sell, assign, hypothecate, borrow upon, or pledge the interest of the principal in any contract of insurance;

pay, from the proceeds of an insurance contract or otherwise, compromise, or contest, and apply for refunds in connection with, a tax or assessment levied by a taxing authority with respect to a contract of insurance or the proceeds of or liability accruing by reason of a tax or assessment;

agree and contract, in any manner and with any person and on any terms that the agent may select, for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify any agreement or contract;

execute, acknowledge, seal, and deliver any consent, demand, request, application, agreement, indemnity, authorization, assignment, pledge, notice, check, receipt, waiver, or other instrument that the agent considers useful for the accomplishment of a purpose enumerated in this subsection;

continue, procure, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, terminate, or otherwise deal with any contract of insurance, other than those enumerated in (1) and (2) of this subsection, or any combination of insurance; and do any act with respect to the contract or with respect to its proceeds or enforcement that the agent considers desirable or necessary for the promotion or protection of the interests of the principal;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving an insurance transaction, or intervene in an action relating to an insurance transaction;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers the action to be desirable for the proper execution of a power described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action;

exercise investment powers available under a contract of insurance or annuity; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent in connection with procuring, supervising, managing, modifying, enforcing, and terminating contracts of insurance in which the principal is the insured or has an interest.

In a statutory form of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to estate transactions shall be construed to mean that, with respect to an estate of a decedent, absentee, minor, incompetent, or the administration of a trust or other fund, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent

to the extent that an agent is permitted by law to act for a principal, apply for and procure, in the name of the principal, authority to act as a fiduciary of any sort;

to the extent that an agent is permitted by law to act for a principal, represent and act for the principal in all ways and in all matters affecting any estate of a decedent, absentee, minor, or incompetent, or any trust or other fund, out of which the principal is entitled, or claims to be entitled, to some share or payment, or with respect to which the principal is a fiduciary;

to accept, reject, disclaim, receive, give a receipt for, sell, assign, release, pledge, exchange, or consent to a reduction in or modification of, a gift, bequest, devise, inheritance, or any interest in a share in or payment from an estate, trust, or other fund, including an interest in any jointly-owned real or personal property or proceeds from an insurance policy;

to demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is, or may become, or may claim to be entitled by reason of the death of a person or of any testamentary disposition or trust, or by reason of the administration of the estate of a decedent or absentee, or of a guardianship of a minor or incompetent or the administration of any trust or other fund; initiate, participate in, and oppose a proceeding to ascertain the meaning, validity, or effect of any deed, will, declaration of trust, or other transaction affecting in any way the interest of the principal; initiate, participate in, and oppose a proceeding for the removal, substitution, or surcharge of a fiduciary; conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for purposes enumerated in this subsection; and reimburse the agent for expenditures properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form powers of attorney;

to prepare, sign, file, and deliver all reports, compilations of information, returns, or papers with respect to an interest had or claimed by or on behalf of the principal in an estate, trust, or other fund; pay, compromise, or contest, and apply for refunds in connection with a tax or assessment with respect to any interest had or claimed by or on behalf of the principal in an estate, trust, or other fund or by reason of the death of any person, or with respect to property in which the principal had or claimed an interest;

to agree and contract, in any manner and with any person and on any terms that the agent may select, for the accomplishment of the purposes enumerated in this subsection, and perform, rescind, reform, release, or modify an agreement or contract or any other similar agreement or contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

to execute, acknowledge, verify, seal, file, and deliver a consent, designation, pleading, notice, demand, election, conveyance, release, assignment, check, pledge, waiver, admission of service, notice of appearance, or any other instrument that the agent considers useful for accomplishment of any of the purposes enumerated in this subsection;

to submit to arbitration or settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, a controversy or claim that affects the estate of a decedent, absentee, minor, or incompetent, or the administration of a trust or other fund, in any one of which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest, and do any act that the agent considers desirable or necessary to carry out the compromise;

to hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers the action to be desirable for the proper execution of any of the powers described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records about that action; and

to do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent, with respect to the estate of a decedent, absentee, minor, or incompetent, or the administration of a trust or other fund, in any one of which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest with respect to which the principal is a fiduciary.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring authority with respect to retirement plans shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent to

select the form and timing of payments under a retirement plan and withdraw benefits from a plan;

make a rollover, including a direct trustee-to-trustee rollover, of benefits from one retirement plan to another;

establish a retirement plan in the principal’s name;

make contributions to a retirement plan;

exercise investment powers available under a retirement plan; and

borrow from, sell assets to, or purchase assets from a retirement plan.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to claims and litigation shall be construed to mean that, as to any claim or litigation, whether arising in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

assert and prosecute before any court, administrative board, department, or other tribunal a cause of action, claim, counterclaim, offset, or defense that the principal has, or claims to have, against an individual, partnership, association, corporation, government, or other person or instrumentality, including, by way of illustration, and not of restriction, power to sue for the recovery of land or of any other thing of value, for the recovery of damages sustained by the principal in any manner for damages sustained as a result of the refusal of a third party to honor the power of attorney, for the elimination or modification of tax liability, for an injunction, for specific performance, or for any other relief;

bring an action to determine adverse claims, intervene or interplead in an action or proceeding, and act in litigation as amicus curiae;

in connection with any legal action, apply for and, if possible, procure preliminary, provisional, or intermediate relief, and resort to and use any available procedure to obtain and satisfy a judgment, order, or decree;

in connection with any legal action, perform an act that the principal might perform, including by way of illustration and not of restriction, acceptance of tender, offer of judgment, admission of facts, submission of a controversy on an agreed statement of facts, consent to examination before trial, and generally bind the principal in the conduct of any litigation or controversy that the agent considers desirable;

submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of or against the principal, or any litigation to which the principal is or may become or be designated a party;

waive the insurance and service of process upon the principal, accept service of process, appear for the principal, designate persons upon whom process directed to the principal may be served, execute and file or deliver stipulations on the principal’s behalf, verify pleadings, appeal to appellate tribunals, procure and give surety and indemnity bonds that the agent finds desirable or necessary, contract and pay for the preparation and printing of records and briefs, receive, execute, and file or deliver a consent, waiver, release, confession of judgment, satisfaction of judgment, notice, agreement, or other instrument that the agent considers desirable or necessary in connection with the prosecution, settlement, or defense of a claim by or against the principal or of any litigation to which the principal is or may become or be designated a party;

appear for, represent, and act for the principal with respect to bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings whether of the principal or of some other person, with respect to a reorganization proceeding, or with respect to a receivership or application for the appointment of a receiver or trustee that affects an interest of the principal in any land, chattel, bond, share, commodity interest, or other thing of value;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent reasonably believes the action to be desirable for the proper execution of any of the powers described in this subsection;

pay, from funds in the agent’s control or for the account of the principal, any judgment against the principal or any settlement that may be made in connection with a transaction enumerated in this subsection, and receive and conserve any money or other thing of value paid in settlement of or as proceeds of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this subsection, and receive, endorse, and deposit checks; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent in connection with a claim by or against the principal or with litigation to which the principal is or may become or be designated a party.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to personal relationships is neither dependent on, nor limited by, authority that an agent may or may not have with respect to gifts under AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

, and shall be construed to mean that, as to real and personal property owned by the principal, whether in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

do all acts necessary to maintain the customary standard of living of the spouse, children, other dependents of the principal, whether living when the power of attorney is executed or later born, and individuals whom the principal has customarily supported or indicated the intent to support, including by way of illustration and not by way of restriction, power to provide living quarters by purchase, by lease, or by other contract, or by any payment of the operating costs, including interest, amortization payments, repairs, and taxes, of premises owned by the principal and occupied by the principal’s family or dependents, to provide normal domestic help for the operation of the household, to provide usual vacations and usual travel expenses, to provide usual educational facilities, to provide funds for all the current living costs of the spouse, children, and other dependents, including, among other things, shelter, clothing, food, and incidentals, and to make periodic payments of child support and other family maintenance required by a court or governmental agency or an agreement to which the principal is a party;

provide, whenever necessary, medical, dental, and surgical care, hospitalization, and custodial care for the spouse, children, and other dependents of the principal;

continue whatever provision has been made by the principal for the principal’s spouse, children, and other dependents, with respect to automobiles, or other means of transportation, including by way of illustration, but not by way of restriction, power to license, insure, and replace automobiles owned by the principal and customarily used by the spouse, children, or other dependents of the principal;

continue whatever charge accounts have been opened for the convenience of the principal’s spouse, children, or other dependents, open any new accounts that the agent considers desirable to accomplish the purposes enumerated in this subsection, and pay the items charged on these accounts by a person authorized or permitted by the principal to make the charges;

continue the discharge of any services or duties assumed by the principal to a parent, relative, or friend of the principal;

supervise, enforce, defend, or settle any claim by or against the principal arising out of property damages or personal injuries suffered by or caused by the principal, or under any circumstance that the resulting loss will or may fall on the principal;

continue payments incidental to the membership or affiliation of the principal in a church, club, society, order, or other organization, or continue contributions to the organization;
